Tennessee, session 114, HB0597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-6-302(b)(2), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
( ) Identification of each bill and legislative measure for which the lobbyist is
receiving compensation to oppose or support.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0597
000776
- 1 -